Wyoming, session 2025, HB0115.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

HB0115

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0340
Section 1. W.S. 35-34-101 through 35-34-106 are
created to read:

CHAPTER 34
MEDICAL ETHICS DEFENSE ACT

35-34-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the
"Medical Ethics Defense Act."

35-34-102. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(i) "Conscience" means the ethical, moral or
religious beliefs or principles held by any health care
provider, health care institution or health care payer. For
health care institutions and health care payers, conscience
shall be determined by reference to the health care
institution's or health care payer's governing documents,
including any published ethical, moral or religious
guidelines or directives, mission statements,
HB0115

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0340
constitutions, articles of incorporation, bylaws, policies
or regulations;

(ii) "Discrimination" means an adverse action
against or the communication of a threat of adverse action
to any health care provider, health care institution or
health care payer as a result of a decision by the health
care provider, health care institution or health care payer
to decline to participate in or pay for any health care
service on the basis of the conscience of the health care
provider, health care institution or health care payer.
"Discrimination" shall not include:

(A) Declining to use, the refusal to use or
the purchase of health care services from a specific health
care provider, health care institution or health care payer
if that health care provider, health care institution or
health care payer exercises the right to refuse to
participate in or pay for health care services based on its
conscience;

HB0115

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0340
(B) Good faith efforts to accommodate
conscientious objections of a health care provider, health
care institution or health care payer.

(iii) "Health care institution" means as defined
by W.S. 35-22-402(a)(x);

(iv) "Health care payer" means any employer,
health plan, health maintenance organization, insurance
company, management services corporation or any other
entity that pays for or arranges for the payment of any
health care service provided to any person, whether the
payment is made in whole or in part;

(v) "Health care provider" means any person who
may be or is asked to participate in any health care
service, including doctors, nurse practitioners, physician
assistants, nurses, nurse aides, allied health
professionals, medical assistants, hospital employees,
clinic employees, nursing home employees, pharmacists,
pharmacy technicians, pharmacy employees, medical school
faculty and students, nursing school faculty and students,
psychology and counseling faculty and students, medical
HB0115

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0340
researchers, laboratory technicians, psychologists,
psychiatrists, counselors, mental health professionals,
social workers or any other person who facilitates or
participates in a health care service;

(vi) "Health care service" means medical care
provided to any person at any time over the course of
treatment, including testing, diagnosis, referral, the
prescribing, dispensing or administering of any drug,
medication or device, psychological therapy or counseling,
research, prognosis, therapy, record making or record
keeping, notes relating to treatment, the preparation for
or performance of a surgery or procedure or any other
medical care or service provided by any health care
provider;

(vii) "This act" means W.S. 35-34-101 through
35-34-106.

35-34-103. Rights of conscience for health care
providers, health care institutions and health care payers.

HB0115

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0340
(a) Each health care provider, health care
institution and health care payer shall have the right to
refuse to participate in or pay for any health care service
that violates the health care provider's, health care
institution's or health care payer's conscience. The right
of conscience provided under this subsection shall:

(i) Be limited to a specific health care
service;

(ii) Not be construed to waive or modify any
duty a health care provider, health care institution or
health care payer has to provide or pay for health care
services that do not violate the health care provider's,
health care institution's or health care payer's
conscience;

(iii) Not be construed to waive or modify any
duty of a health care provider or health care institution
to provide other health care services or provide emergency
medical treatment under 42 U.S.C. § 1395dd.

HB0115

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0340
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act,
a religious health care provider, health care institution
or health care payer that holds itself out to the public as
religious, states in its governing documents that it has a
religious purpose or mission and has internal operating
policies and procedures that implement its religious
beliefs shall have the right to make employment, staffing,
contracting and admitting privilege decisions consistent
with its religious beliefs.

(c) No health care provider shall be scheduled for,
assigned or requested to directly or indirectly perform,
facilitate, refer for or participate in any abortion unless
the health care provider first affirmatively consents in
writing to perform, facilitate, refer for or participate in
the abortion.

(d) Each health care institution shall adopt internal
policies, programs, plans or procedures for each health
care provider employed, contracted or granted admitting
privileges by the health care institution for the health
care provider to exercise the right to refuse to
participate in a health care service based on the health
HB0115

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0340
care provider's conscience as provided by subsection (a) of
this section.

(e) Each health care payer shall adopt internal
policies, programs, plans or procedures for:

(i) How the health care payer may exercise its
right to refuse to pay for a health care service based on
its conscience as provided by subsection (a) of this
section;

(ii) The resolution of conflicts arising between
a health care payer exercising the right to refuse to pay
for a health care service based on its conscience as
provided by subsection (a) of this section and a health
care institution or health care provider who provided the
health care service to the patient.

(f) A health care payer shall file and update the
conscience policies established under subsection (e) of
this section not less than annually with the state
insurance department by including a comprehensive list, by
billing code, of any products, services and procedures that
HB0115

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0340
the health care payer will not pay or make payment for
based on its conscience. The annual filing shall be
submitted annually to each beneficiary of the health care
payer.

(g) A health care payer shall not refuse or reduce
payments based on its conscience to a health care provider,
health care institution or a beneficiary for any product,
service or procedure that is not included in the annual
filing required under subsection (f) of this section.

35-34-104. Participation in health care services;
discrimination prohibited.

(a) No person or entity shall discriminate against
any health care provider, health care institution or health
care payer for exercising the right to refuse to
participate in or pay for health care services based on
conscience under this act.

(b) No person or entity shall discriminate against a
health care provider or health care institution for:

HB0115

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0340
(i) Providing the health care provider's
employer, the department of health or the attorney general
of Wyoming information relating to any violation of or any
act or omission that the health care provider or health
care institution reasonably believes violates this act; or

(ii) Testifying, assisting, participating or
agreeing to testify, assist or participate in a proceeding
concerning a violation of this act.

(c) Unless the disclosure is specifically prohibited
by law, no health care provider shall be subject to
discrimination for disclosing any information that the
health care provider reasonably believes violates:

(i) Any federal or state law, rule or
regulation;

(ii) Any standard of care or other ethical
guidelines for the provision of any health care service; or

(iii) Gross mismanagement, a gross waste of
funds, an abuse of authority, practice or methods of
HB0115

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0340
treatment that may place a patient's health at risk or a
substantial and specific danger to public health or safety.

(d) The department of health or a board, certifying
agency or licensing agency shall not reprimand, sanction or
revoke or threaten to revoke a license, certificate,
certification or registration of a health care provider for
engaging in speech or expressive activity protected by the
first amendment to the United States constitution unless
the department, board or agency demonstrates beyond a
reasonable doubt that the health care provider's speech was
the direct cause of physical harm to a person with whom the
health care provider had established a health care
provider-patient relationship within the immediately
preceding three (3) years before the incident of physical
harm.

(e) Not later than fourteen (14) days after receipt,
the department of health or any board, certifying agency or
licensing agency, as applicable to the health care
provider, shall provide a health care provider with notice
of any complaint or action to suspend or revoke the health
care provider's license, certificate, certification or
HB0115

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0340
registration. The department or a board or agency that
fails to provide notice under this subsection shall be
liable for damages of five hundred dollars ($500.00) for
each full or partial week that the notice is not provided
to the health care provider. This subsection shall not
apply if notice of a complaint or action is required to be
provided within a shorter period of time under another
provision of law.

35-34-105. Right of conscience and right of refusal;
immunity from liability.

(a) No health care provider, health care institution
or health care payer shall be subject to civil or criminal
liability for exercising the right to refuse to participate
in or pay for any health care service based on the right of
conscience provided in W.S. 35-34-103(a).

(b) No health care institution shall be subject to
civil or criminal liability for a health care provider
employed, contracted or granted admitting privileges by the
health care institution for the health care provider
exercising the provider's right to refuse to participate in
HB0115

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0340
a health care service based on the right of conscience
provided under W.S. 35-34-103(a).

35-34-106. Health care services and right of
conscience; civil remedies.

A health care provider, health care institution or health
care payer may bring a civil action for damages or
injunctive relief, or both, in a court of competent
jurisdiction for any alleged violation of this act.

Section 2.

(a) This act shall apply to health care services
provided, and health care payment obligations, that were
provided or arose on and after July 1, 2025.

(b) This act shall not be construed to supersede any
law of the state that is equally as protective of the
conscience or more protective of the conscience than this
act.

HB0115

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0340
Section 3. The department of insurance and the
department of health shall promulgate all rules necessary
to implement this act.

Section 4.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.

(b) Sections 3 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0115